Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2771YH (2) 91 da/ns H.F. 486 Section 1. Section 468.506, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The bona fide owner of agricultural land in the election 3 district for which the trustee is elected, and a resident of 4 the county in which that district is located or of a county 5 which is contiguous to or corners on that county this state . 6 Sec. 2. Section 468.506, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 c. The individual must be a resident of the county in 9 which the election district is located or of a county that is 10 contiguous to or corners on that county this state . 11